Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
The club shall be organized and operated to provide to its members, their guests, and others an eighteen-hole golf course and amenities provided by other similar clubs;

The club shall serve at least one (1) meal daily, five (5) days a week;

The club shall have a clubhouse with not less than three thousand square feet (3,000 sq. ft.) with suitable kitchen, dining facilities and equipment; and

The club shall not discriminate against any person on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

(i) “Club” also means a for-profit recreational club organized and existing under the laws of this state that has been in existence and operating for at least two (2) years prior to March 31, 2003, and that is located in any county not having a metropolitan form of government and having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and further possesses the following characteristics:

Has at least two hundred twenty-five (225) members paying monthly or annual dues, or both, and does not discriminate against members or potential members or bona fide guests of the members on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

Is organized and operated exclusively for recreation and provides a regulation eighteen-hole golf course for the use of its members and guests, and may or may not also provide for the use of its members and guests a swimming pool and tennis facility; and

Has a clubhouse with not less than ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.) with suitable kitchen, dining facilities and equipment, serving at least one (1) meal daily, at least five (5) days a week;

It is the express intention of the general assembly that the law concerning the purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age be strictly enforced by the club;

(i) “Club” also means a for-profit recreational club, organized and existing under the laws of this state, which is located in a county having a population of not less than four hundred thirty-two thousand two hundred (432,200) nor more than four hundred thirty-two thousand three hundred (432,300), as of the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and further possesses the following characteristics:

Has at least three hundred (300) members, as of December 23, 2015, paying dues with a copy of membership applications on file on the premises and which issues to its members a membership card which authorizes admittance of the member and bona fide guests of such member;

Is organized and operated exclusively for recreation and provides a regulation eighteen-hole golf course for the use of its members and guests, and also may offer for the use of its members and guests a swimming pool and other recreational amenities;

Has a clubhouse with not less than ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.) with a suitable kitchen, dining facilities, and equipment, serving at least one (1) meal daily at least five (5) days a week;

The club may not compensate or pay any officer, director, agent, or employee any profits from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages based on the volume of those beverages sold; and

It is the express intention of the general assembly that the law concerning the purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age be strictly enforced by the club;

(i) “Club” also means a for-profit recreational club, organized and existing under the laws of this state, which is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-two thousand nine hundred (122,900) nor more than one hundred twenty-three thousand (123,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and further possesses the following characteristics:

Has at least three hundred (300) members, as of January 1, 2017, paying dues with a copy of membership applications on file on the premises and that issues to its members a membership card which authorizes admittance of the member and bona fide guests of such member;

Is located within a planned residential development consisting of no less than six hundred (600) acres and at least three hundred (300) residential dwelling units, and such residential development contains an eighteen-hole golf course;

Is organized and operated exclusively for recreation and provides a regulation eighteen-hole golf course for the use of its members and guests, and also may offer its members and guests the use of a swimming pool, tennis courts, and other recreational amenities;

Has a clubhouse with not less than nine thousand square feet (9,000 sq. ft.) with a suitable kitchen, dining facilities, and equipment, serving at least one (1) meal daily at least five (5) days a week;

The club does not compensate or pay any officer, director, agent, or employee from any profits from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages based on the volume of those beverages sold;

The premises, as provided in §57-4-101(a)(2), for a club, whether such parcel comprising the club premises are contiguous or not, shall also include the golf course; tennis courts; all areas of the clubhouse; the area immediately surrounding the swimming pool, if a club offers such amenities; and all other related recreational facilities; and

It is the express intention of the general assembly that the law concerning the purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age be strictly enforced by the club;

(i) “Club” also means a for-profit membership-based social club, organized and existing under the laws of this state, that is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and further possesses the following characteristics:

Is located within a building containing three (3) floors and a rooftop area, totaling approximately six thousand square feet (6,000 sq. ft.) that houses a bar, coffee bar, cigar lounge with lockers, meeting and relaxation space, conference rooms, private call rooms, and workstations;

Is within a central business improvement district as of 2020;

Is organized and operated exclusively for offering an upscale business club environment for learning and networking, where members receive exclusive access to amenities and opportunities in the city;

Has at least ten (10) members paying monthly or annual dues, as of January 1, 2020, with a copy of membership applications on file on the premises and that issues to its members a proximity reader security access card which authorizes admittance of the member and bona fide guests of such member;

Offers its members the ability to purchase all club-related services and experiences through cash or credit card;

Offers its members access to multiple locations across the United States, each tailored to its city and located in prime business districts, and offers its members access to experience specialists, who arrange for its members' needs, ranging from dinner reservations, vacation rentals, and unique travel amenities and luxury experiences; and

Does not discriminate against members or potential members or bona fide guests of such members on the basis of gender, race, creed, color, sex, age, religion, or national origin;

The premises for the club, includes all floors of the singular building constituting the club, whether contiguous or not and connected through stairwells and elevators; the rooftop area; and any area within the building designated by the club in its application for licensure for consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises;

“Commercial airline” includes any airline operating in interstate commerce under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the appropriate federal or state agency, or under an exemption from the requirement of obtaining a certificate of public convenience and necessity but otherwise regulated by an appropriate federal or state agency, with adequate facilities and equipment for serving passengers, on regular schedules, or charter trips, while moving through any county of the state, but not while any such commercial airline is stopped in a county or municipality that has not legalized such sales;

“Commercial airline travel club” means an organization established and operated by or for a commercial airline as defined in this section for the convenience and comfort of airline passengers;

“Commercial passenger boat company” means a company that operates one (1) or more passenger vessels for hire upon navigable waterways and is licensed by the United States Coast Guard to carry not less than fifty (50) passengers on a single vessel. A commercial passenger boat company licensed pursuant to this chapter shall not sell any type of alcoholic beverage or beer while such boat is docked within the boundaries of any local government that has not approved the sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to §57-4-103. A commercial passenger boat company may only operate out of a county that has a population:

In excess of two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Not less than eighty-three thousand three hundred (83,300) nor more than eighty-three thousand four hundred (83,400), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census; or

Not less than one hundred sixty thousand six hundred (160,600) nor more than one hundred sixty thousand seven hundred (160,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Commission” means the alcoholic beverage commission, created pursuant to chapter 1 of this title;

(A) “Community theater” means a facility or theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The community theater is at least eight (8) years old;

The theater is operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member or officer, agent or employee of any community theater shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of their assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the community theater, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing, and maintenance of the theater. No alcoholic beverages or beverages of any kind shall be possessed or consumed inside the auditorium of such theater during performances in such auditorium;

The theater provides or leases facilities for theatrical programs of cultural, civic and educational interest; and

The theater is located in any county having a population of not less than seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also includes a facility or theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility has a performance hall seating not less than two hundred fifty (250) persons, a resource library, rehearsal rooms, and permanent exhibition space of not less than nine thousand square feet (9,000 sq. ft.);

The facility is operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member or officer, agent or employee of any community theater shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of their assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the facility, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization;

The facility provides or leases facilities for concerts and programs of cultural, civic and educational interest; and

The facility is located in any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) nor more than two hundred eighty-six thousand (286,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Alcoholic beverages may be sold at a community theater only during one (1) performance or benefit program a day and only one (1) hour before, during and one (1) hour after the performance or benefit program;

“Community theater” also includes a facility or theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility is located in a building that is at least eighty (80) years old;

The facility has a performance hall seating approximately two hundred fifty (250) persons;

The facility is operated by a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), and no member or officer, agent or employee of any community theater is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of the salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of the person's assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing and maintenance of the facility, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization;

Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold before or after performances or during intermissions in the performances, and no alcoholic beverages shall be consumed inside the auditorium of the facility; and

The facility is located within a municipality that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, in a referendum in the manner prescribed by §57-3-106, in any county having a population of not less than thirty-three thousand five hundred twenty-five (33,525) nor more than thirty-three thousand six hundred (33,600), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also includes a privately owned facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is a community theater in continuous operation since 1943;

Is primarily a volunteer organization with limited salaried staff;

Has an auditorium with more than three hundred (300) seats;

Is located on an historic square and is allowed to sell alcoholic beverages at up to five (5) special events annually that are held on the historic square along with being allowed to sell alcoholic beverages as provided in subdivision (13)(C); and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than seventy-one thousand three hundred (71,300) nor more than seventy-one thousand four hundred (71,400), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also includes a facility or theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The facility is at least twenty-seven (27) years old;

The facility has a performance hall seating not less than one hundred fifty (150) persons and not more than five hundred (500) persons;

The facility is operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member or officer, agent or employee of any community theater is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of the salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of the person's assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing and maintenance of the facility, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization; and

The facility is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred thirty-four thousand seven hundred (134,700) nor more than one hundred thirty-four thousand eight hundred (134,800), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also includes a municipally owned facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is a community theater in continuous operation since 1980;

Has an auditorium with more than three hundred (300) seats;

Provides or leases facilities for concerts, plays and programs of cultural, civic and education interest; and

The facility is located in any municipality that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, in a referendum in the manner prescribed by §57-3-106, and the municipality has a population of not less than twenty-three thousand nine hundred twenty (23,920), nor more than twenty-three thousand nine hundred thirty (23,930), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also means a theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The theater was founded in 1923;

The theater has a main performance hall with not less than three hundred eighty (380) seats;

The theater has an auxiliary performance hall with not less than two hundred (200) seats;

The facility is operated by a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member, officer, agent, or employee of the theater is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of the salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of the person's assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by the not-for-profit corporation must be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing, and maintenance of the theater, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. Alcoholic beverages may be sold before, during, and after performances, and may be consumed inside any auditorium or performance hall within the theater; and

The theater is located within one thousand feet (1,000') of the Tennessee River in a city with a population of one hundred sixty-seven thousand six hundred seventy-four (167,674), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also means a theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The theater opened on December 9, 1949;

The theater originally seated approximately one thousand (1,000) persons in spring-covered chairs;

The theater reopened in July of 2012, serving as a multifunctional event venue, hosting weddings, concerts, nonprofit events, movies, and musical theatre; and

The theater is located in a city with a population of not less than twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety (26,190) and not more than twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-nine (26,199), according to the 2010 and any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also means a theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The theater was opened in 1995;

The theater's performance hall has seating for at least one hundred twenty (120) patrons;

The theater is used for concerts, plays, and programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest;

The theater is operated by a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member, officer, agent, or employee of the theater is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of the salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of the person's assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by the not-for-profit corporation must be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing, and maintenance of the theater, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. Alcoholic beverages may be sold before, during, and after performances, and may be consumed inside any auditorium or performance hall within the theater; and

The theater is located in a county having a population not less than two hundred sixty-two thousand six hundred (262,600) nor more than two hundred sixty-two thousand seven hundred (262,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Community theater” also means a theater possessing each of the following characteristics:

The theater began operating in 1965;

The theater is the only major nonprofit professional performing arts resource in rural Tennessee, and one (1) of the ten (10) largest professional theaters in rural America;

The theater serves more than one hundred forty-five thousand (145,000) visitors annually with two (2) indoor and two (2) outdoor stages;

The theater provides young audience productions, a comprehensive dance program, a concert series, and touring shows;

The theater was the recipient of the Governor's Arts Award for the state of Tennessee in 1984;

The theater is operated by a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member, officer, agent, or employee of the theater is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of the salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of the person's assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by the nonprofit corporation must be used for the operation, renovation, refurbishing, and maintenance of the theater, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. Alcoholic beverages may be sold before, during, and after performances, and may be consumed inside any auditorium or performance hall within the theater, or on theater property contiguous to an outdoor performance stage; and

The theater is located in a city having a population of not less than ten thousand seven hundred ninety (10,790) and not more than ten thousand seven hundred ninety-nine (10,799), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(A) “Convention center” means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Owned by the state, municipal and/or county government, or a nonprofit, tax exempt, charitable organization that operates a symphony orchestra, and leased or operated by that government or by a nonprofit charitable corporation established to operate such facility;

Designed and used for the purposes of holding meetings, conventions, trade shows, classes, dances, banquets and various artistic, musical or other cultural events;

A convention center does not include a building located within one thousand (1,000) yards of both a student museum and a zoological park; provided, that any restaurant, located within a former world's fair site or a zoological park and which meets the requirements of subdivision (30), shall be eligible for licensure under this chapter as long as the requirements of this chapter are otherwise met;

A convention center also does not include a building which is more than twenty (20) years old and is located in any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(a) Except as provided for in (14)(A)(iii)(b ), which state-owned facility, operated by a nonprofit charitable corporation established to operate such facility, has a designated, restricted area outside the seating area of any theater within which area the consumption of such alcoholic beverages shall be permitted. The sale of such alcoholic beverages in such facility is limited to no more than one (1) hour and fifteen (15) minutes prior to a meeting, show, performance, reception, or other similar event, and to no later than thirty (30) minutes after such event; and

In a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, which state-owned facility, operated by a nonprofit charitable corporation established to operate such facility, or facility owned by a nonprofit, tax exempt, charitable organization that operates a symphony orchestra, has designated an area within or adjacent to any theatre or meeting space, or adjacent to the facility within which area the consumption of alcoholic beverages shall be permitted. Nothing herein shall restrict the ability of a convention center, as defined herein, from adjusting the designated area within or adjacent to its theatre areas, upon adequate prior notice to the commission;

Located in a municipality having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) and in a county having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), or both, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A convention center licensed under this subdivision (14)(A) shall have the privilege of granting a franchise for the provision of food or beverage, including alcoholic beverages, on its premises, and the holder of the franchise shall also be considered a convention center under this subdivision (14)(A);

“Convention center” also means a facility meeting the criteria of subdivision (14)(A)(i) and (ii) and located in a premiere resort city as defined by §67-6-103(a)(3)(B)(i);

“Convention center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Owned by a county public building authority at the time of development;

Designed and used for the purposes of attracting conventions, business travelers, tourists and other visitors to promote economic development;

Located at the intersection of Interstate 24 and Highway 41 near mile marker 114;

Occupies an area of not less than approximately thirteen thousand five hundred square feet (13,500 sq. ft.); and

Includes a full commercial kitchen to provide meals and catering services;

“Convention center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is owned by a quasi-governmental development agency;

Is designed and used for the purposes of attracting conventions, business travelers and tourists to the area and is vital in promoting economic development, fostering community activities, providing training and seminar space for business and industries and in encouraging tourism;

Is available for community, industry and private events;

Is the only one of its kind in the area;

Has a seating capacity of approximately three hundred (300) and is fully equipped with tables, chairs, linens, dishware and a catering kitchen;

Occupies an area of approximately eight thousand five hundred square feet (8,500 sq. ft.) on acreage surrounding Tellico Lake; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand five hundred (44,500) nor more than forty-four thousand six hundred (44,600), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

No member or officer, agent or employee of any convention center as defined by this section shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of spirituous liquors, wines, champagnes, malt beverages or any other alcoholic beverage beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its governing body out of the general revenue of the center. All profits from the sale of such alcoholic beverages shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the convention center;

“Country club located on an historic property” means a country club that is located in a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand five hundred (44,500) nor more than forty-five thousand (45,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and has the following characteristics:

Sits on real property that was formerly the home of the International Printing Pressmen Union;

Has a dining facility; and

Is located adjacent to an eighteen-hole golf course;

(A) “Festival operator” means a person licensed under this subdivision (16) who is either a for-profit business operating a festival for a period of up to seven (7) days in length in which alcoholic beverages or beer will be sold, given away, or otherwise dispensed or a third party with whom such for-profit business engages to conduct alcoholic beverage or beer sales during such festival;

The commission shall issue a license to a festival operator upon the payment of a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day of the festival, and the submission of an application on a form prescribed by the commission that provides proof satisfactory of the following information, to the satisfaction of the commission:

The premises on which alcoholic beverages or beer will be served, sold, dispensed, or consumed is sufficiently designated, enclosed, secured, and maintained;

Adequate security for the festival is provided;

The number and location of each point of sale in which alcoholic beverages or beer will be served, sold, dispensed, or consumed is specified. If the operator of any such point of sale, including any person or entity that receives any portion of the proceeds of the sale of alcoholic beverages or beer from that point of sale, is different from the festival operator, the name and relevant information of such other operator must be specified on the application to the commission, and the commission may determine that such other operator is required to obtain an additional festival operator license;

The staff selling, serving, or dispensing alcoholic beverages or beer are adequately trained and supervised in the service of alcoholic beverages and beer and on the applicable laws regarding such service;

The city or county in which, or the state governmental entity responsible for the property on which, the festival is to be held has approved the festival; and

If the applicant intends to sell, serve, or dispense beer, the applicant has a beer permit issued in accordance with chapter 5 of this title;

No person licensed under this title, operating in conjunction with a festival operator licensee, or performing any activities for which a license is otherwise required under this title, other than a festival operator or special occasion licensee licensed under this section, may provide any service, item, or other thing of value to a festival operator or with respect to a festival operator's festival, except as may be expressly authorized by the commission. Additionally, no festival operator may receive or accept any item or service that a person under this subdivision (16) is prohibited from providing. All alcoholic beverages used for the festival must be purchased from wholesalers licensed under §57-3-203. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a wholesaler may buy back any unopened and resalable bottles of alcoholic beverages at the end of the festival. A wholesaler shall keep all records, as may be required by the commission, necessary to document the purchase of such products pursuant to this subdivision (16);

All applicable taxes, including the tax levied on the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises under §57-4-301, must be remitted as required by law;

Alcoholic beverages and beer may be sold, given away, dispensed, or consumed only within hours sufficient to ensure adequate public health, safety, and welfare as determined by the commission or local beer board, as applicable;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the commission finds that any of the requirements of this subdivision (16) have not been, or are not being, met by a festival operator during a festival or after the completion of a festival, or that the festival operator misrepresented information in the person's application, the commission may use the failure or misrepresentation as the basis to summarily suspend the license of the festival operator, to deny any future applications for a festival operator license for a period of up to two (2) years after the festival in which the failure or misrepresentation occurred, or to issue a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, which disciplinary action must be resolved prior to the issuance of any new festival operator license to the festival operator;

(A) “Historic inn” means a historic building that is located in a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand five hundred (44,500) nor more than forty-five thousand (45,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and has the following characteristics:

Was built in 1824 and was formerly the oldest continuously operating inn in Tennessee;

Was once visited by United States Presidents Andrew Jackson, Andrew Johnson and James K. Polk, all of whom stayed and dined there; and

Has a dining facility and a total of nine (9) rooms and suites;

“Historic inn” also means a country inn that is located in any county having a population of not less than seventy-one thousand one hundred (71,100) nor more than seventy-one thousand two hundred (71,200), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and has the following characteristics:

Has been in operation since 1938;

Is located within one-half (½) mile of the Great Smoky Mountains National Park;

Has a total of twenty-four (24) guest rooms and a dining facility offering fine dining to guests and other patrons with a seating capacity of no more than sixty (60); and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

“Historic inn” also means an inn that has all of the following characteristics:

Contains at least ten (10) transient guest rooms in the main house;

Has a separate meeting lodge and facility that also houses at least four (4) transient suites;

Has at least two (2) kitchens on the premises and offers at least two (2) meals daily;

Has an open-air, outdoor, sylvan chapel suitable for the accommodation of wedding ceremonies;

Provides entertainment in the form of cooking demonstrations, storytelling and dulcimer playing;

Is listed in Distinguished Inns of North America, 16th Edition, by Select Registry;

Is located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred five thousand eight hundred (105,800) nor more than one hundred five thousand nine hundred (105,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin;

(A) “Historic interpretive center” means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

The center is located in an historic area of town where structures listed on the national register of historic places are located;

The center operates as a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), as amended, where no member or officer, agent or employee of any historic interpretive center shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation any profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages beyond the amount of such salary as may be fixed by its governing body for the reasonable performance of the assigned duties. All profits from the sale of alcoholic beverages by a not-for-profit corporation shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the historic interpretive center, and in furtherance of the purposes of the organization. Alcoholic beverages may be consumed inside the center at locations designated by the board of the not-for-profit corporation;

The center provides facilities for programs of cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, musical concerts, films, receptions, exhibitions, seminars or meetings; and

The center is located in any county having a population of not less than seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Historic interpretive center” also means a commercially operated facility owned by a not-for-profit organization possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on the Cumberland Plateau, within one (1) mile of a national river and recreation area;

Offers historic interpretation of Victorian-era British architecture, lifestyle, and settlement on the Cumberland Plateau in the 1880s and thereafter;

Operates public education programs in multiple historic buildings built from 1880 to 1884, including the oldest unchanged and preserved public library in America;

Preserves the historic character of a British settlement on the Cumberland Plateau in the 1880s through a board of directors engaged in land acquisition and management, design review of new construction and renovation, and the public enjoyment of period crafts, music, and folklife through the organization of festivals, support for local artists through the sale of arts and crafts in a commissary;

Owns, sells, and develops home sites for construction of design-approved homes;

Offers overnight accommodations to visitors in historic inn and cottage settings;

Operates a restaurant serving breakfast, lunch, and dinner to visitors, community residents, guests, and members of the public;

Attracts thousands of visitors annually from around the world;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Is located within any county having a population of not less than nineteen thousand five hundred (19,500) nor more than nineteen thousand seven hundred seventy five (19,775), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Historic interpretive center” also means a facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Was founded in 1983;

Is located on Martin Luther King Boulevard;

Provides programs of historical, cultural, civic, and educational interest, including, but not limited to, art exhibitions and musical concerts;

Is owned by a municipal or county government;

Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold at the center before or during performances; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than three hundred thirty-six thousand four hundred (336,400) nor more than three hundred thirty-six thousand five hundred (336,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;
